Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1085.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 39, chapter 1, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 39-130, to read: START_STATUTE39-130. Employment candidate records; disclosure; exception; definitions A. Except as provided in subsection B of this SECTION, this chapter does not require the disclosure of any document that is part of a candidate's hiring process, including the candidate's name. B. On the conclusion of the hiring process, The selected candidate's name, job title and salary may be disclosed pursuant to this chapter and in accordance with any other applicable federal or state law. C. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Candidate": (a) means a PERSON who during the hiring process applies for employment by a public body. (b) Does not include a senior level public official or officer. 2. "Document" includes a resume, an application, a reference letter, a background check report and any other materials that are submitted or obtained as part of the hiring process. 3. "Hiring process": (a) Means the period of time during which an employer evaluates a candidate for employment. (b) Includes the time when an application is submitted and during interviews and background checks. 4. "Senior level public official or officer" means both of the following: (a) an individual who is in a senior leadership position or who is appointed to a position in any public body. (b) a person who is elected or appointed to hold any elective or appointed office of a public body, a chief administrative officer, a SUPERINTENDENT or a cabinet-level member who serves a public body. END_STATUTE